Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 Enlisted Personnel

38-2-230.
Enlistment; qualifications; period of service; transfer; discharge; extensions of enlistments.

The qualifications for enlistment and reenlistment, the period of enlistment, reenlistment, and voluntary extension of enlistment, the period of service, the form of oath to be taken, and the manner and form of transfer and discharge of enlisted personnel of the forces of the organized militia shall be those prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and by this chapter and by regulations issued thereunder.

Any person who has been discharged under other than honorable conditions from the organized militia of this or any other state or from any component of the armed forces of the United States and who has not been restored to duty shall not be eligible for enlistment in any force of the organized militia.

The Governor is authorized to extend the period of any enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment, and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the organized militia for, but not exceeding the duration of, an emergency declared by him.

Whenever the period of enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment, and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the reserve components of the armed forces of the United States is extended, the Governor shall extend the period of any enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment, and the period of service of enlisted personnel in the corresponding force of the organized militia for the same period.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-602, 86-603, 86-605; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 19; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 50.

38-2-231.
Contract and oath of enlistment; penalty.

Every person who enlists or reenlists in any force of the organized militia shall sign an enlistment contract and shall take and subscribe such oath or affirmation of enlistment as may be prescribed by the applicable laws of the United States and by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. The oath shall be taken and subscribed before any officer authorized by Code Section 38-2-213 to administer the oath of office to a commissioned officer. A person making a false oath as to any statement contained in the enlistment contract commits the offense of false swearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-604, 86-9905; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 53; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 51.

Cross references.

False swearing generally, §

16-10-71

.

38-2-232.
Noncommissioned officers and petty officers; appointments; appointing officer; termination of appointment.

All noncommissioned officers and petty officers of the organized militia shall be appointed at the discretion of the appointing officer upon the nomination of the officer under whose immediate command they are to serve. The appointment shall be in accordance with regulations of the United States and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Appointing officers shall be designated in regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. The appointment of a noncommissioned officer or a petty officer may be terminated as prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-601; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 52.

38-2-233.
Discharges; conditions; form.

An enlisted person may be discharged from any force of the organized militia prior to the expiration of his term of enlistment under such conditions as may be prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and by this chapter and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

An enlisted person discharged from a force of the organized militia shall receive a discharge in writing in such form and of such type or classification as may be prescribed by applicable laws and regulations of the United States and by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-607; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 19; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 53.

38-2-234.
Absent without leave; dropping from rolls.

When an enlisted person of the organized militia absents himself without leave for three months and there is reason to believe that he does not intend to return, he may be dropped from the rolls under such regulations as may be prescribed pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 54.